Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 65. Clinical Mental Health Counselors

§ 3261.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Board of Allied Mental Health Practitioners established under this chapter.

“Clinical mental health counseling” means providing, for a consideration, professional counseling services that are primarily drawn from the theory and practice of psychotherapy and the discipline of clinical mental health counseling, involving the application of principles of psychotherapy, human development, learning theory, group dynamics, and the etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to individuals, couples, families, and groups, for the purposes of treating psychopathology and promoting optimal mental health. The practice of clinical mental health counseling includes diagnosis and treatment of mental conditions or psychiatric disabilities and emotional disorders, psychoeducational techniques aimed at the prevention of such conditions or disabilities, consultations to individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations, and communities, and clinical research into more effective psychotherapeutic treatment modalities.

“Clinical mental health counselor” means a person who is licensed to practice clinical mental health counseling under this chapter.

“Disciplinary action” includes any action taken by the Board against a licensed clinical mental health counselor or applicant premised on a finding that the licensed clinical mental health counselor or applicant has engaged in unprofessional conduct. The term includes all sanctions of any kind, including obtaining injunctions, refusing to grant or renew a license, suspending or revoking a license, and issuing warnings.

“Allied mental health fields” include those fields for which training includes coursework in the diagnosis and treatment of mental disorders.

“Psychotherapy” means the provision of treatment, diagnosis, evaluation, or counseling services to individuals or groups, for a consideration, for the purpose of alleviating mental disorders. “Psychotherapy” involves the application of therapeutic techniques to understand unconscious or conscious motivation, resolve emotional, relationship, or attitudinal conflicts, or modify behavior that interferes with effective emotional, social, or mental functioning. “Psychotherapy” follows a systematic procedure of psychotherapeutic intervention that takes place on a regular basis over a period of time, or, in the case of evaluation and brief psychotherapies, in a single or limited number of interventions. If a person is employed by or under contract with the Agency of Human Services, this definition does not apply to persons with less than a master’s degree; to persons providing life skills training or instruction, such as learning to make friends, to handle social situations, to do laundry, and to develop community awareness; or to interactions of employees or contracted individuals with clients whose job description or contract specifications do not specifically mention “psychotherapy” as a job responsibility or duty.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), (d);

1993, No. 98

, § 8;

1993, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1997, No. 40

, § 50;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 177.

§ 3262.
Prohibition; offenses.

No person shall practice or attempt to practice clinical mental health counseling, nor shall any person use in connection with the person’s name any letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a clinical mental health counselor unless the person is licensed in accordance with this chapter.

A person who violates this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 98

, § 9;

2007, No. 29

, § 43.

§ 3262a.
Board of Allied Mental Health Practitioners.

The Board of Allied Mental Health Practitioners is established.

The Board shall consist of six members appointed by the Governor pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004.

Two members shall be licensed clinical mental health counselors; one member shall be a licensed marriage and family therapist; one member shall, at the time of appointment, be a nonlicensed and noncertified psychotherapist entered on the roster; and two members shall be public members.

The public members shall have no direct financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister in clinical mental health counseling, marriage and family therapy, or psychotherapy.

The professional members shall have at least three years of professional experience as a clinical mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or psychotherapist and shall be actively engaged in one of these professions during incumbency.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 51; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 92;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 3263.
Allied Mental Health Board; duties.

The Board shall:

provide general information to applicants for licensure as clinical mental health counselors;

administer fees collected under this chapter;

explain appeal procedures to licensed clinical mental health counselors and applicants and complaint procedures to the public;

receive applications for licensure, license applicants under this chapter, renew licenses, and revoke, reinstate, or condition licenses.

The Board may adopt rules necessary to perform its duties under subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4(d), 80;

1993, No. 98

, § 10;

1997, No. 40

, § 52.

§ 3264.
Repealed. 1997, No. 40, § 74.

§ 3265.
Eligibility.

To be eligible for licensure as a clinical mental health counselor an applicant shall have:

Received a master’s degree or higher degree in counseling or a related field, from an accredited educational institution, after having successfully completed a course of study requiring a minimum number of graduate credit hours established by the Board by rule and a supervised practicum, internship, or field experience, as defined by the Board by rule, in a mental health counseling setting.

Documented a minimum of 3,000 hours of supervised work in clinical mental health counseling during a minimum of two years of post-master’s experience, including at least 100 hours of face-to-face supervision during a minimum of two years of post-master’s experience. Persons engaged in supervised work shall be registered on the roster of nonlicensed, noncertified psychotherapists and shall comply with the laws applicable to registrants.

Passed the examinations required by Board rules.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 98

, § 12;

1993, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 9a;

1997, No. 40

, § 53;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 93;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§§ 3266,
3267.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 3268.
Licensing without examination.

The Board may waive the examination requirement if the applicant is a clinical mental health counselor regulated under the laws of another jurisdiction, who is in good standing to practice clinical mental health counseling in that jurisdiction, and, in the opinion of the Board, the standards and qualifications required for regulation of clinical mental health counseling in that jurisdiction are substantially equivalent to those required by this chapter. The Board may adopt by rule criteria for licensing clinical mental health counselors who have five years’ licensed or certified practice experience in another jurisdiction of the United States or Canada.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

1997, No. 40

, § 73(a);

2003, No. 60

, § 17;

2007, No. 29

, § 44.

§ 3269.
Renewals.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon payment of required fees and proof of such continuing education as the Board may require by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

1993, No. 98

, § 15;

1997, No. 40

, § 55;

2011, No. 66

, § 10, eff. June 1, 2011;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 3270.
Repealed. 1997, No. 59, § 65(4), eff. June 30, 1997.

§ 3270a.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application for licensure $150.00 (2) Biennial renewal $200.00

Click to view

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 29, 1998; amended

1999, No. 49

, § 181;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. June 21, 2002;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2019, No. 70

, § 22.

§ 3271.
Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct means the following conduct and conduct set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

:

using dishonest or misleading advertising;

misusing a title in professional activity;

conduct that evidences unfitness to practice clinical mental health counseling;

engaging in any sexual conduct with a client, or with the immediate family member of a client, with whom the licensee has had a professional relationship within the previous five years;

harassing, intimidating, or abusing a client;

entering into an additional relationship with a client, supervisee, research participant, or student that might impair the licensed clinical mental health counselor’s objectivity or otherwise interfere with the clinical mental health counselor’s professional obligations;

independently practicing outside or beyond a clinical mental health counselor’s area of training, experience, or competence without appropriate supervision; or

using conversion therapy as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 8351

on a client younger than 18 years of age.

After hearing, and upon a finding of unprofessional conduct, the Board may take disciplinary action against a licensed clinical mental health counselor or applicant.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 98

, § 17;

1993, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1997, No. 40

, § 57;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 53;

2007, No. 29

, § 45;

2015, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 3272.
Professional designation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the use and incorporation into the title of a clinical mental health counselor of a professional designation issued by a nationally recognized professional licensing organization.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 98

, § 18.

§ 3273.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to persons while engaged in the course of their customary duties as clergy, licensed physicians, psychologists, nurses, osteopaths, optometrists, dentists, lawyers, social workers, certified marriage and family therapists and psychoanalysts, rostered psychotherapists, or licensed educators when performing their duties consistent with the accepted standards of their respective professions; provided, however, that they do not describe themselves to the public by any other title or description stating or implying that they are clinical mental health counselors or are licensed to practice clinical mental health counseling.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to persons while engaged in the course of their customary duties:

in the activities and services of the clergy or leader of any religious denomination, or sect or a Christian Science practitioner when engaging in activities that are within the scope of the performance of the person’s regular or specialized ministerial duties and for which no separate charge is made, or when these activities are performed, with or without charge, for or under the auspices of sponsorship, individually or in conjunction with others, of an established and legally recognizable church, denomination, or sect, and when the person rendering services remains accountable to the established authority of that church, denomination, or sect;

in employment or rehabilitation counseling;

as an employee of or under contract with the Agency of Human Services, provided the person does not practice psychotherapy as defined in section 3261 of this title;

as a mediator;

in an official evaluation for court purposes;

as a member of a self-help group, such as Alcoholics Anonymous, peer counseling, or domestic violence groups, whether or not the person is serving for a consideration;

as a respite caregiver, foster care worker, or hospice worker.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to any person licensed as a clinical mental health counselor under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 98

, § 19; amended

1993, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

1995, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

1999, No. 52

, § 29.

§ 3273a.
Exceptions.

This chapter shall not apply to a person engaged or acting:

in the discharge of his or her duties as a student of clinical mental health counseling or preparing for the practice of clinical mental health counseling provided that the person’s title indicates his or her training status, if the preparation occurs under the supervision of a licensed practicing clinical mental health counselor in recognized training institutions or facilities or in a training program approved by the Office of Professional Regulation;

in clinical training for licensure as a psychologist or clinical social worker or for certification as a marriage and family therapist or a psychoanalyst provided that the person’s title indicates his or her training status and that the person does not identify him or herself as a clinical mental health counselor.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, this chapter shall apply to any person licensed as a clinical mental health counselor under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 11a; amended

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 3274.
Disclosure of information.

The Board shall adopt rules requiring licensed clinical mental health counselors to disclose to each client the clinical mental health counselor’s professional qualifications and experience, those actions that constitute unprofessional conduct, the method for filing a complaint or making a consumer inquiry, and provisions relating to the manner in which the information shall be displayed and signed by both the clinical mental health counselor and the client. The rules may include provisions for applying or modifying these requirements in cases involving clients of designated agencies, institutionalized clients, minors, and adults under the supervision of a guardian.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 12; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 58;

2015, No. 38

, § 33, eff. May 28, 2015.